Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CENTERS FOR INDEPENDENT LIVING; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $7,011,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $7,011,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants to centers for independent living under Minnesota Statutes, section 268A.11. new text end